tex/context/patterns/lang-is.pat
\patterns {
.a[eth]3
.a[eth]a4
.a[eth]k2
.a[eth]l4a
.af3n
.af3re
.afr3[iacute]
.af1s4
.agn5[uacute]
.al3e
.al4l
.am4s
.an3k
.ann4e
.ar2
.ar3a4b5
.arth5
.asp3
.aum5a
.[aacute]m4
.[aacute]n4a
.ba4
.da4
.dam5a
.dav3
.dr4
.ds4
.du4
.dust5
.ed5ik
.eftir5
.eigin5g
.eink4
.ekt4
.er4m
.eyf2
.fa4
.fi4
.fj[aacute]r3
.fl4
.fla4
.fr4
.fr[aacute]1
.ga2
.gar4
.gas5l
.gd4
.gem5
.gja2
.gl2
.gr4
.gu4
.her5sk
.il4
.ingj5
.is4m
.[iacute]s1l
.ja2
.jar4
.ka4
.kal5e
.kam5e
.kap[iacute]3
.kart5
.kast3
.kn4
.kr4
.kur4
.la4
.lag5e
.leik5sv
.l[iacute]b5
.lu4
.ma2
.maj5
.mak5r
.mi4
.mj4
.mu4
.mynst4
.na2
.n[iacute]5f
.n[yacute]5f
.ol4[iacute]u.
.[oacute]a4
.[oacute][eth]5al
.[oacute]f4
.[oacute]g2
.[oacute]k4
.[oacute]m4i
.[oacute]s2
.pa4
.pl4
.ra2
.ram4
.r[iacute]4
.r[oacute][eth]4
.r[uacute]m3
.saman5
.sk4
.ski4
.skj4
.skr4
.sl2
.sm4
.sm[aacute]3l
.sn4
.snar5a
.sp4
.spr4
.st4
.sta2
.ta4
.ti2
.til3
.t[iacute]5f
.tr4
.tu2
.tv[iacute]1
.ung3l
.unn5usta
.[uacute]r1
.[uacute]t1
.[uacute]t5s
.vegg5s
.vist3
.yfir3
.[aeligature]vi3s
.[odiaeresis]fl3
.[odiaeresis]gr5
.[odiaeresis]r3s
.[odiaeresis]t3u
2a3a4
a4ab
a4ad
2a1[aacute]2
2a1b
ab4a
3ab[iacute]s
a5by
ab[aeligature]k4l
4ac
2a1d4
a5d[oacute]
a4du
1a[eth]
4a[eth]a[eth]
a[eth]3al
a[eth]3ar
2a[eth]fa
4a[eth]f[odiaeresis]
a[eth]3g
a[eth]3i
2a[eth]l
a[eth]4li
4a[eth]2m
2a[eth]sh
3a[eth]u.
2a[eth]v
2a1e
a5ei
a4es
2af
af3ald
af3arn
a3f[aacute]
af4fr
af3g
a1fj
a3fl[oacute]
a1flu
af5ork
a1fr
af3r[eacute]
afr4u
a5fr[aeligature]
4afsd
af1sk
4afsso
af2u
a1ful
a1fun
3afur[eth]
2ag
a3gau
ag5[aacute]l
ag5is
a5gj
agn4ara
ag2ne
ag5ot
a1gr
ag4ra
ags4i[eth]
ag4sp
ag4stj
ag4ul
ag3[aeligature][eth]
4a1h
4ai
a3i[eth]
a4in
a[iacute]4h
2aj
a3j[odiaeresis]
2ak
akaup4s
a5k[aacute]
a1ke
a5kinnin
a5kistu
a1kj
ak5rei
aks4l
4akss
ak3u
a3kv
a5ky
a5k[yacute]
a3k[odiaeresis]
2al
a1lag
4aland
a5landi[eth]
a5landinu
alas4
al[aacute]4
a4lem
al3er
al1f
al1g
5alge
3alh
alis4
al4[iacute]n
al3kj
alk5s
al3k2u
al4l[iacute]
all2s
allst4
al4l[yacute]
4alma[eth]
al5mann
al5m2i
a3log
a5lok
al5op
a5l[oacute][eth]
al4s[aeligature]t
al5up
al5[uacute]
al3v4
a3ly
a1l[aeligature]
a1l[odiaeresis]
2am
am3ang
a3mann
am3ari
am3ars
am3a4s
am3dr
a3m[iacute]
am3k
am2m
amm4is
a1m[oacute]
am3se
ams2i
am1t
1an
3an.
3ana.
an3ada
4anag
2anal
4anau
2an[aacute]
4and.
and1e
4an4d[iacute]
andr4
4and[odiaeresis]
4ane
an5ei
2ang
an4ga
ang1d
an4gj
ang5spi
an2g3[odiaeresis]
4anib
4ani[eth]
an5[iacute]n
2ank
ank5l
ank3v
3anm
ann5d
4annf
4annh
ann1k
4annl
4anns
annsk4
4an4o
anst4
an3sti
an3t[iacute]
3anu
4an[uacute]
4an[yacute]
4an[aeligature]
4an[odiaeresis]
2a3o
2a3[oacute]
2ap
ap3al
a3per
a3pil
a3po
a5pre
ap3te
a5p4un
a5p[odiaeresis]r
1ar
3ar.
ar3afu
ara5kr
ar3ang
4arani
ar4arp
ar2as
ar5ast.
ar3au
2ar[aacute]4
4ar[aacute][eth]
5ar3[aacute]k
3ar3[aacute]r
3ar1[aacute]s
ar1[aacute]t
3ard2
4ard[iacute]
4ar[eth].
ar[eth]ar5[aacute]
4ar[eth]i
4ar[eth]s
3ar[eth]u.
2are
3ar1ef
4aref.
5areig
5arein
a3rek
ar3el
ar3en
ar5er
a3ret
4a1r[eacute]
2arf
3arfe
3arf[eacute]
arfs3k
ar1fu
ar3gj
ar4gr[aeligature]
args4
arg3sl
4ar5i[eth]
4arif
ar3in
ar4ind
ar5ist.
4a5rit
4a1r[iacute]
ar3j4
4ark.
ark4is
ar5kj
ar3kr4
4arms
ar3m[uacute]
4arna.
4aro[eth]
4arol
4arot
2ar[oacute]
2arp
4arra
arr2i
arr4u
ar4s[aacute]
3arse
ar1sk
ar4spi
arst4
5arst[iacute]
ar3su
ar5til
artr2
ar5tra[eth]
ar3u
ar4u[eth]
4ar4ug
5arum
2ar1[uacute]
a5r[uacute]s
ar3v4
ar3yf
4ar[yacute]
2ar[aeligature]
a3r[aeligature][eth]
ar5[aeligature]v
4ar[odiaeresis]
as2
4a1sa
as3an
2a3s[aacute]
4ase
4as[eacute]
2asi
a5sinna
2asj
4a1sk
2asl
a3slag
2a1sm
4asn
4aso
4as[oacute]
2asp
asp[iacute]t4
4ass
ass4v
1ast
4asta[eth]
ast4and
4astau
4aste
4ast[eacute]
4astig
4astin
ast4ing
4astir[eth]
4a1st[iacute]
4astj
ast3l
4asto
2ast[oacute]
4astr[aacute]
ast5r[aacute][eth]
4astr[iacute]
4a3str[aeligature]
4astr[odiaeresis]
4astul
4a3st4un
4ast[uacute]
4a3sty
4ast[aeligature]
4ast[odiaeresis]
2a1su
2a1sv
4as4y
2as[yacute]
4as[aeligature]
2as[odiaeresis]
2at
at3a[eth]
a3tak
a3tal
at4anv
ata4r
a1te
at3ey
3ath
a1til
a3tj
3atk
atns3
a4t[oacute]
atr4a
at1re
3at1ri
at2sp
a5t2un
a1t[uacute]
at4ve
3atvi
a1t[odiaeresis]
2a4u2
4au[eth].
au[eth]5li
5au[eth]n
aug4as
au4m
aum5ba
aum5un
aun5dr
aup5e
aup3l
a5upp
au4s
ausa5m
au4t
2a1[uacute]
2a1v
av4ar.
a3vir
2ay
a5yf
4az
2a1[thorn]
a2[thorn][oacute]
2a3[aeligature]
4a5[odiaeresis]
[aacute]1a
[aacute]ak4
[aacute]a5lo
[aacute]1b
[aacute]4bu
[aacute]1d4
4[aacute][eth]
[aacute][eth]2s
[aacute][eth]3sn
[aacute][eth]3sta
[aacute][eth]2u
[aacute][eth]3us
[aacute]1e
[aacute]f2
[aacute]5f[aacute]
[aacute]5f[iacute]
[aacute]3fl
[aacute]fl[aeligature][eth]4
[aacute]f5un
[aacute]g2i
[aacute]gl4
[aacute]gr2
[aacute]g1s
[aacute]g3v
[aacute]1h
[aacute]1i
[aacute]k2a
[aacute]kam4
[aacute]kap4
[aacute]k[oacute]4
[aacute]la3m
[aacute]l3arf
[aacute]l2as
[aacute]5lau
[aacute]3let
[aacute]lf3d4
[aacute]lf5sk
[aacute]l4m
[aacute]lm5an
[aacute]lm5u
[aacute]lp3
[aacute]l4se
[aacute]l5sva
[aacute]l5ug
[aacute]5l[uacute]
[aacute]l3[aeligature][eth]
2[aacute]m
[aacute]m[aacute]l5a
[aacute]msl4
[aacute]2n
[aacute]n4aro
[aacute]n2as
[aacute]n4o
[aacute]3n[yacute]
5[aacute]n[aeligature]
[aacute]3o
4[aacute]p
[aacute]ra5g
[aacute]r3an
[aacute]rar4
[aacute]5r[eacute]
[aacute]r3f4
[aacute]r5g
[aacute]r5k4
[aacute]r1m
[aacute]rns4
[aacute]rn5sl
[aacute]r2st
[aacute]r5t
[aacute]r1u
[aacute]r3v
[aacute]5r[aeligature]
[aacute]s5en
[aacute]1sk
[aacute]2ska
[aacute]4ske
[aacute]3s4l
[aacute]s2m
[aacute]st2
[aacute]st5i
[aacute]st5r[aacute][eth]
[aacute]st5r[iacute]k
[aacute]st5v
4[aacute]su4
[aacute]s5va
[aacute]t3a[eth]
[aacute]1te
[aacute]tr4as
[aacute]ttar3
5[aacute]ttin.
[aacute]tt3un
[aacute]1t[aeligature]
[aacute]1u
[aacute]uk4
[aacute]3ve
[aacute]3v[iacute]
[aacute]1v[aeligature]
[aacute]1[thorn]
[aacute]5[aeligature][eth]
b2a
4ba.
ba[eth]k4
ba4h
bak5sl
ba2n
4bana
4ban[iacute]
bank5an
4bans
b5ant
bar2b
bar[eth]4as
bar2n
b[aacute]4s
2b4b
bb3a[eth]
bb3an
bb5arn
bb3i
bb3u[eth]
1be
bess4
b2i2
bi[eth]5i
bi[eth]5lis
bi[eth]5r4
bif1
bilj5
bill5
4binn
bisk3
b4it
bit2a
4b[iacute]a
2b3[iacute]s
2b3[iacute]u
3bj
bjar2
b4l2
bl4[iacute]unn
4bn
5bo
3b[oacute]4
b[oacute]k3s
b4r2
br5a[eth]
bra4s
3bro
br4u
3br[uacute]
4bum4
bur2
3bur[eth]
burst5a[eth]
bu4s
1b[uacute]
b[uacute]f4
b[uacute]3sta
1by
1b[yacute]
b[aeligature]k2i
b[aeligature]n4a
1b[aeligature]r
b5[aeligature]ttism
1b[odiaeresis]
4b[odiaeresis]ki
c4a
ci4
ck4
4da.
daf4
dak2
3dal.
5dals
da1m4
d5ang
d4an[iacute]
d4arad
d4ar4a[eth]
dar4[aacute]r
d3arf
d5arp
dask4
da3sl
4dav
d1b
2dd
4dea
d5ef
3deg
1deil
d1en
d5e[oacute]
5dep
d1f4
d1g2
d4gi
d1h
d1i
di5fu
d3ill
dim4
di3ma
di3nav
d2ine
dir3s
d[iacute]3d
d5[iacute][eth]
d5[iacute]nu
3d[iacute]s
d[iacute]v3
3dj4
djarf5a
d1k2
d1l2
d2la
dl3a[eth]
d3lag
d3lau
d4li[eth]
dl3u
d1m
d5olf
d5[oacute][eth]
d3[oacute]f
d[oacute]5l[iacute]
1d[oacute]2m
d[oacute]m5an
d[oacute]5ne
3d[oacute]r
d[oacute]2s
d[oacute]s5e
4dq
d5ra[eth]f
dr4a[eth]s5
d5ra[eth]st
drafn4
dr4ara
3dreg
d5reip
d5rey
d5ri[eth]a
d3r[iacute]k
d5ro[eth]
dru4
d4r[aeligature]t
2ds
d5sal
d4sj[odiaeresis]
dsk2
ds4ko
ds5kun
ds1l
d5sn[odiaeresis]
ds1s4
d1st4
d4sti
ds4u[eth]
d4s[odiaeresis]f
d1t2
d1u
duf4
5duft
duk4
d4umb
du5r[aeligature]
d4usta
d3[uacute]n
d[uacute]n4a
d[uacute]t4
d1v4
4dw
1dy
1d[yacute]
d3[thorn]
1d[aeligature]
4d[aeligature]f
4d[aeligature]r
3d[odiaeresis]
[eth]1a
[eth]af4
[eth]a3g
[eth]ak4
[eth]4albo
[eth]3ald
[eth]al4is
[eth]4a1m4
[eth]3a4n
[eth]anmeg4
[eth]ar1a
[eth]3ar3f
[eth]ar3l
[eth]ar4lis
[eth]ar3t4
[eth]3ar[uacute]
[eth]at4a
[eth]3au
[eth]3[aacute]2
[eth]1b
[eth]1d2
[eth]1e
[eth]3f4
[eth]1g
[eth]2ga
[eth]2gi
[eth]g4l
[eth]4gn
[eth]gu4
[eth]3g4ul
[eth]1h
[eth]1i
[eth]i3g
[eth]ik4
[eth]3in
[eth]is5l
[eth]ist4
[eth]4ista
[eth]is4ve
[eth]j3as
[eth]3j[oacute]
[eth]4ju
[eth]3ke
[eth]1kr
[eth]k2un
[eth]3kunn
[eth]1kv
[eth]1l[aacute]
[eth]l2in
[eth]l4ist
[eth]3l[iacute]
[eth]l4ur
[eth]1l[aeligature]
[eth]1m2
[eth]num4
[eth]3o
[eth]3[oacute]
[eth]1p2
[eth]r5[aacute]t
[eth]1re
[eth]1r[eacute]
[eth]3rik
[eth]3r[iacute]k
[eth]5r[oacute]
[eth]r1u
[eth]3r[uacute]
[eth]1r[aeligature]
[eth]r[aeligature][eth]is5
[eth]s5afl
[eth]s5[aacute]
[eth]4seg
[eth]s4inn
[eth]1sk
[eth]skr4
[eth]4sk[uacute]
[eth]s5kv
[eth]4sk[odiaeresis]
[eth]s4lu
[eth]2so
[eth]s3or
[eth]ss4
[eth]1st2
[eth]2st[iacute]
[eth]3st[odiaeresis]
[eth]s4u
[eth]4svi
[eth]2s[aeligature]
[eth]1t4
[eth]1u
[eth]3u[eth]
[eth]3ug
[eth]3ull
[eth]5uls
[eth]5unn
[eth]3unu
[eth]3ur
[eth]ur5[aacute]
[eth]ur3f
[eth]ur5g4
[eth]ur5st
[eth]1v
[eth]v5a[eth]
[eth]v3ann
[eth]v3arn
[eth]1y
[eth]5[yacute]
[eth]1[thorn]
eat4
ebr5e
ed4e
e1dik
ed3it
e[eth]3a2
e[eth]al1
e[eth]3il
e[eth]4is
e2f
e3fal
ef3i
efj5an
ef4n
4eft.
2efts5
eg4ge
eg3i
egr5u
eg3u4l
egur4s
e4i
ei[eth]5ar
ei[eth]4st
eif4as
ei4ka
eik3li
eik3u
eil3ag
eil5[odiaeresis]
ei2m
eim5u
eing4
1eink
4eino
eist5a[eth]
e4k
ek2is
ekj5a
ekn3
ek3u
ek5[uacute]
e2l
el5[aacute]s
el4d
el3eg
elf3in
el4gr
el1i
4el[iacute]
el3[iacute]n
el4ke
el2l
ell5an
ell3e
elleg4
el3[oacute]
el3r
el1s[iacute]
5elsk
el4te
elu5s
e2m
em4ba
1embe
em5ens
em3i4
emj3
em4l
eml2i
empl5
em5u
e2n
4enc
en4g
eng3a
enik4
2enn
enn4t
en4t
ep4h
ep3i
epl5i
e4pr
ep4t
e4r
er3al
er5au
er5[aacute]
4er[eth]
5ere
er5et
erf5ar
er2fr
erf3u
erg5l
er4gr
er3i
er2k
er4la
erl3i
er4l[iacute]
er4mi
erm5in
er5[oacute]l
er5skj
er1un
er2v
er3[odiaeresis]
er[odiaeresis]f4
e2s
es3a
es4ban
es4bu
4esj
e5ske
4eso
esp3a
es2s
est3a[eth]
est5[odiaeresis]
e3s[aeligature]
etik4
et5ils
etna4
et5o
etr5an
etr3u
etul4
et2us
ext4u
5eyrar
[eacute]3b
[eacute]1d
[eacute][eth]2s
[eacute]3fe
[eacute]1g4
[eacute]5ky
[eacute]1l
[eacute]la4g
[eacute]l4ara
[eacute]2li
[eacute]4lj
[eacute]l3r
[eacute]r1
[eacute]r4[aacute]
[eacute]r4r
[eacute]rs4
[eacute]r4un
[eacute]r3v
[eacute]3sm
[eacute]tt4ug
[eacute]t4un
[eacute]tur4
f3a[eth]
fa2g
fa5k
1fall
fal4u
fa4n[aacute]
fa5p4
f2ar
f3ar[eth]
f4are
f4arg
farka5l
f3arl
fast3e
f[aacute]3f
f5[aacute]ns
f[aacute]3r[aacute]
f[aacute]3ta
f[aacute]3v
f1b4
fd2an
f1dr
f5d[uacute]
f[eth]a4l
1fe
f3ef
f3ein
3fel
f3end
ferl5i
fer3t
f1ey
1f[eacute]
f4fa
f2fo
f1fr
ff4st
ff[aeligature]r4a
f1g2
f2ga
f2gi
fg4n
f1h
f3i[eth]
fik4
f5il.
f5ili
f3ill
f5ils
f5ilv
fim3a
f4ine
f3inu
3fir[eth]i
f3ir[eth]u
firg2
f3irn
1firs
3f4isk
fi5so
f3ist.
f3istu
fis5v
f[iacute]4
f5[iacute]kv
f3[iacute]s
fj4a
fj5a[eth]u
fj5ann
fj4e
f1k2
fl3and
fl4at
3flata
f5l[aacute]t
f4len
fl5g
1flo
5flut
flv4
4fl[yacute]
1fl[odiaeresis]
f1m
4fn
fn1g
f5n4[iacute]
fn3k
fn5ok
1fo
4fop
forf4
fork4
1f[oacute]
fr2
4fra.
fr3a[eth]
fra4m
fram3l
fr5and
4frar
2fri.
fr5in
fr[iacute]5m4
f3r[oacute]f
fru4
fr3u[eth]
1fr[aeligature]
2f3r[aeligature]k
4fr[aeligature]n
fs3[aacute]
f4sel
f4skaf
fsl4
fs3li
fs5na
f2so
fs5or
fsr4
fss4
f4sti
f5s4t[aeligature]
fs1v
f4s[aeligature]
ft3a[eth]
fta4sk
ft5[aacute]
f3te
ft2s
fts5l
ft3u
ft4ul
f1u
4fu.
f3u[eth]
3fugl
fund4as
2f3ur
5fur[eth]ul
fur5e
furs4
fur3t
4f2us
f5ust.
f3ustu
f1v4
1fy
f3yrt
f1[thorn]
1f[aeligature]
1f[odiaeresis]
f[odiaeresis]r4l
g1a
4ga.
4g3a[eth]
gaf4ar
gagl4
3gagn
gak4
ga4lag
gal4is
5gals
5galt
gam3al
gam4i
g5and
1gang
gap4a
g4ard.
g2ar[eth]
3gar[eth].
3gar[eth]a
3gar[eth]i
3gar[eth]4s
5gar[eth]ur
g3ar3f
gar4kl
gar3l
gar3t
4gas
g4as.
g4as[iacute]
g3ast.
ga5sta[eth]
1gata
gat4r
g[aacute]2
3g[aacute]f
g[aacute]5le
g1b
gd4ans
g3de
g4du
gd4v
g[eth]4aro
1ge
3gei
2g1el
gen4
g5end
3geng
g3ent
5ger[eth]
ger5[iacute]
germ4
gerv5a
get3r
g1f2
ggis5
ggjaf3
ggj5ar
gg5r[aacute]
gg3r[aeligature]
ggs4v
gg3ug
gg2v
g4g[odiaeresis]
g1h
g1i
4gi.
4gik
gi5kv
3gild
g5ill
5gilt
gim4a
4g3i4n
gis4a
g4isp
g5ist[aeligature]
g[iacute]r5a
g[iacute]s4
gjaf5ar
gjaf5o
gjak4
gjal4
gj4asta
1gj[odiaeresis]
g1k4
gkal4
g1l[aacute]
g4le[eth]
g3leg
gl5[eacute]
gl3f2
g3lit
g5l[iacute]n
gl3[oacute]t
glsk4
3glugg
glu3s
gl4y
g3l[aeligature]r
g1m4
gnap4
gnart4
g4n[aacute]
gn3g
g3n[oacute]
gn4se
gn5ug
g4n[yacute].
3gol
g3or
3g[oacute][eth]
g[oacute]r5
g[oacute]4ur
g1p
g3rak4
gr4an
gra2s
gras5sv
g2r[aacute]
1grei
g3reis
g5rey[eth]
gr2i
2gri.
gri[eth]4
g3r[iacute]k
3gr[oacute]
3grund
3grunn
g3r[aeligature][eth]i
g2r[aeligature]n
4gs
gs1[aacute]
g4sei
gsk4
gs4len
gsl2u
gs4l[odiaeresis]
gs3m
gs5or
gs3s4
gs4si
gs1v
gt3a[eth]
g3te
gt4s
2g1u
g4u[eth]i
